sv: Typ av gitarrbeslag/del: Bro; Nut; Pickguard; Sadel; Remknapp; Stämskruv; Övrigt
cs: Typ osazení/dílu kytary: Most; Ořech; Kryt snímače; Sedlo; Knoflík na popruh; Ladící kolík; Jiné
fi: Kitaran sovitus/osatyyppi: Silta; Pähkinä; Pleksilevy; Satula; Hihnan painike; Viritystappi; Muu
ro-RO: Tip accesoriu/piesă pentru chitară: Punte; Prăguș; Protecție împotriva zgârierii; Cordar; Buton cordar; Cheiță de acordaj; Altele
fr: Type de raccord/pièce de guitare: Pont; Sillet; Plaque de protection; Selle; Attache-courroie; Mécanique; Autre
da: Guitartilpasning/deltype: Bro; Nut; Plekterguard; Sadel; Remknap; Stemmepind; Andet
hu: Gitárkiegészítő/-alkatrész típusa: Híd; Felső nyereg; Koptató; Nyereg; Szíjgomb; Hangolókulcs; Egyéb
el: Εξάρτημα κιθάρας/τύπος ανταλλακτικού: Γέφυρα; Παξιμάδι; Διακοσμητικό κάλυμμα; Σέλα; Κουμπί ιμάντα; Κλειδί χόρδισης; Άλλο
vi: Loại phụ tùng/lắp đàn guitar: Ngựa đàn; Hạt quả hạch; Pickguard; Yên xe; Nút dây đeo; Chốt điều chỉnh; Khác
es: Tipo de accesorio/pieza de guitarra: Puente; Cejuela; Golpeador; Montura; Botón para correa; Clavija de afinación; Otros
zh-CN: 吉他零配件类型: 桥; 上弦枕; 护板; 鞍座; 背带扣; 卷弦钮; 其他
en: Guitar fitting/part type: Bridge; Nut; Pickguard; Saddle; Strap button; Tuning peg; Other
de: Gitarrenteile/Teiletyp: Brücke; Mutter; Schlagbrett; Sattel; Gurtknopf; Stimmwirbel; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Typ vybavenia/dielu gitary: Most; Orech; Pickguard; Sedlo; Gombík na popruh; Ladiaci kolík; Iné
zh-TW: 吉他配件/零件類型: 橋; 堅果; 護板; 座墊; 背帶扣; 調音器; 其他
ru: Тип фурнитуры или детали для гитары: Бридж; Орех; Защитная накладка; Седло; Пуговица для ремня; Колок для настройки; Другое
tr: Gitar montajı/parça tipi: Köprü; Somun; Pickguard; Eyer; Kayış düğmesi; Akort burgusu; Diğer
hr-HR: Vrsta opreme/dijela za gitaru: Most; Konjić; Pickguard; Sedlo; Gumb za remen; Ključevi za ugađanje; Ostalo
pt-BR: Montagem/tipo de peça de guitarra: Ponte; Noz; Protetor; Sela; Botão de correia; Afinador; Outro
bg-BG: Тип част/аксесоар за китара: Мост; Гайка; Пикгард; Седло; Бутон за каишка; Щифт за настройка; Други
ko: 기타 피팅/부품 타입: 브리지; 견과류; 픽가드; 새들; 스트랩 버튼; 튜닝 페그; 기타
sl-SI: Vrsta kitarske opreme/dela: Mostiček; Sedlo; Nabiralnik; Sedlo; Gumb za trak; Navijalka; Drugo
pl: Rodzaj części i osprzętu do gitar: Bridge; Podstrunnica; Osłona przeciwuderzeniowa; Siodło; Zaczep paska; Klucz stroikowy; Inne
nl: Type gitaarfitting/-onderdeel: Brug; Noot; Slagplaat; Zadel; Riemknop; Afstemknop; Andere
th: ประเภทฟิตติ้ง/ชิ้นส่วนกีต้าร์: สะพานสาย; นัท; ปิ๊กการ์ด; เนื้อส่วนหลัง; หมุดร้อยสายสะพาย; ลูกบิด; อื่นๆ
nb: Gitarbeslag-/deltype: Bro; Nøtt; Plekterbrett; Sal; Stroppknapp; Stemmepinne; Annet
lt-LT: Gitaros priedo / dalies tipas: Tiltelis; Veržlė; Mediatoriaus apsauga; Balnelis; Dirželio saga; Derinimo kuoliukas; Kita
it: Tipo di raccordo/parte per chitarra: Ponte; Noce; Pickguard; Sella; Pulsante cinturino; Picchetto di accordatura; Altro
ja: ギターフィッティング/パーツタイプ: ブリッジ; ナッツ; ピックガード; サドル; ストラップボタン; チューニングペグ; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de encaixe/peça para guitarra: Ponte; Porca; Guarda-costas; Selim; Botões de correia; Tarraxas de guitarra; Outro